Utah statutes.
42-2-7.   Index -- Fees -- Evidence.

(1)  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall:

(a)  keep an active alphabetical index of all persons filing the certificates provided for in this chapter; and

(b)  collect the required indexing and filing fees.

(2)  A copy of any such certificate certified by the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall be presumptive evidence of the facts contained in the certificate.



Amended by Chapter 222, 1988 General Session

